Delaware, session 153, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1343A, Title 4 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1343A. Conversion licensing process. (a) Beginning August 1, 2024, the Commissioner may begin accepting applications for conversion licenses from compassion centers. Facilities granted a conversion license may commence operations as follows: (1) A cultivation facility, manufacturing facility, or testing facility may commence operations immediately upon receipt of a conversion license. (2) A retail facility may commence operations only upon receipt of authorization to operate by the Commissioner. Before authorizing a retail marijuana store with a conversion license to commence operations, the Commissioner must consider the following: a. The ability of the converted retail marijuana store to continue to serve the medical market. b. The number of retail marijuana stores under this Part C of this subchapter that are available to open. (b) A conversion license expires 24 months after it is issued. (c) No conversion license may be issued after November 1, 2024. (d) Prior to the expiration of a conversion license, the licensee may apply to renew the license as an open license of the type applicable to the facility. An open license may not be issued under this subsection for a retail facility if the location of the retail facility is in violation of the law of a municipality under Â§ 1351 of this title. A renewal fee of $10,000 is required to renew the conversion license as an open license. This renewal fee is in lieu of any renewal fee that would be required to renew an open license other than a conversion license.